Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-358.01
Delinquent support order payments; records.

Records of delinquencies in support order payments shall be kept by the Title IV-D Division of the Department of Health and Human Services or by the clerks of the district courts pursuant to their responsibilities under law.

Laws 1975, LB 212, § 3;

Laws 2000, LB 972, § 10;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 57.